RHVoiceCore/RHVoice/src/scripts/Spanish/tok.foma
# Copyright (C) 2024-2025  Mateo Cedillo <angelitomateocedillo@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

source romans.foma

define Apos %'|%‘|%’ ; 
define CaseVariants 
a -> a|A , 
á -> á|Á , 
b -> b|B , 
c -> c|C , 
d -> d|D , 
e -> e|E , 
é -> é|É , 
f -> f|F , 
g -> g|G , 
h -> h|H , 
i -> i|I , 
í -> í|Í , 
j -> j|J , 
k -> k|K , 
l -> l|L , 
m -> m|M , 
n -> n|N , 
ñ -> ñ|Ñ , 
o -> o|O , 
ó -> ó|Ó , 
p -> p|P , 
q -> q|Q , 
r -> r|R , 
s -> s|S , 
t -> t|T , 
u -> u|U , 
ú -> ú|Ú , 
ü -> ü|Ü , 
v -> v|V , 
w -> w|W , 
x -> x|X , 
y -> y|Y , 
z -> z|Z ; 

define ConsonantLetterSequence 
[b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|z]+ ; 

define LetterSequence 
[ConsonantLetterSequence .o. CaseVariants].l ; 

define SmallLetter b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z;
define CapitalLetter B|C|D|F|G|H|J|K|L|M|N|Ñ|P|Q|R|S|T|V|W|X|Y|Z;
define SmallVowel a|á|e|é|i|í|o|ó|u|ú|ü|y|ý ; 
define CapitalVowel A|Á|E|É|I|Í|O|Ó|U|Ú|Ü|Y|Ý ; 
define Letter SmallLetter | SmallVowel | CapitalLetter | CapitalVowel;
define ExceptionalWord 
[[a|A] %. [m|M] %.] | 
[[p|P] %. [m|M] %.] | 
[[a|A] %. [c|C] %.] | 
[[d|D] %. [c|C] %.] | 
[L u n %.] | [M a r %.] | [M i é %.] | [J u e %.] | [V i e %.] | [S á b %.] | [D o m %.] | 
[e n e %.] | [f e b %.] | [a b r %.] | [m a y %.] | [j u n %.] | [j u l %.] | [a g o %.] | [s e p %.] | [o c t %.] | [n o v %.] | [d i c %.] | 
[[e|E] [t|T] [c|C] %.] | 
[[w|W] [i|I] %- [f|F] [i|I]] ; 
define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;
define Digit %0|NZDigit;
#define year Digit^<4 ; 
#define DayOrMonth Digit^<2 ; 
#define dateSep %/ ; 
define Number  %0 | [NZDigit Digit*];
define DecimalSeparator %.|%,;
define Word [Letter+ [Apos Letter+]*] | ExceptionalWord ;
define Symbol \[Letter | Digit] ; 
#define Date [Digit^2 dateSep Digit^2 dateSep Digit^4] ; 

define Stage1 
Word @-> ... word || _ .#. | \Letter ,, 
NZDigit Digit* @-> ... num ,, 
%0 Digit+ @-> ... dig ,, 
%0 @-> ... num ,, 
# We will apply this future new token for Spanish, called date, when someone helps me with cpp code for it.
# We did an experimental approach by adding date support in number processing. However, I have concluded that the best option is that date support must have its own token type, because. a) we can create a switcher in the configuration file easily to enable or disable if the user wants date reading, and b) it is more easy to control because it is a separated way, outside numbers.
#Date @-> ... date || _ ,, 
Symbol @-> ... sym || _ ; 

define Stage2 
# SplitWordsWhenCamelCase, so voices canInterpretAsSeparateWords InsteadOfOnlyOne
[..] -> word || [CapitalLetter|CapitalVowel] [SmallLetter|SmallVowel]+ _ [CapitalLetter|CapitalVowel] [SmallLetter|SmallVowel]+ ,, 
word -> num || [.#.|sym] ESRomanNumeral _ [.#.|[? sym]] ; 

define Stage3 
# Custom LSeq handling:
[..] -> lseq || [CapitalLetter|CapitalVowel] _ [CapitalLetter|CapitalVowel] [SmallLetter|SmallVowel] ,, 
word -> lseq || 
.#. (Symbol sym) CapitalLetter^2 CapitalVowel _ (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) .#. , 
.#. (Symbol sym) CapitalLetter^3 CapitalVowel _ (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) .#. , 
.#. (Symbol sym) CapitalLetter^4 CapitalVowel _ (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) .#. , 
.#. (Symbol sym) CapitalLetter^5 CapitalVowel _ (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) .#. , 
.#. (Symbol sym) CapitalVowel CapitalLetter^2 _ (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) .#. , 
.#. (Symbol sym) CapitalVowel CapitalLetter^3 _ (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) .#. , 
.#. (Symbol sym) CapitalVowel CapitalLetter^4 _ (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) .#. , 
.#. (Symbol sym) CapitalVowel CapitalLetter^5 _ (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) .#. , 
.#. (Symbol sym) CapitalLetter CapitalVowel CapitalLetter^2 _ (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) .#. , 
.#. (Symbol sym) CapitalLetter CapitalVowel CapitalLetter^3 _ (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) .#. , 
.#. (Symbol sym) CapitalLetter CapitalVowel CapitalLetter^4 _ (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) .#. , 
.#. (Symbol sym) CapitalLetter^2 CapitalVowel CapitalLetter^2 _ (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) .#. , 
.#. (Symbol sym) X CapitalVowel CapitalLetter _ (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) .#. , 
.#. (Symbol sym) CapitalLetter CapitalVowel W _ (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) (Symbol sym) .#. ; 

define Stage4 
word -> lseq || [.#.|word|num|dig|sym] LetterSequence _ ,, 
sym -> num || [sym|.#.] %- _ Digit,
sym -> num || [sym|.#.] %+ _ Digit,
num DecimalSeparator _ Digit+,,
num -> dig || Digit^16 _ ,, 
[num:0] [%º|%ª] [sym:num] -> ; 

define Stage5 
word -> lseq || .#. _ ;
#num -> sym || DecimalSeparator _ Digit+ num DecimalSeparator num,
# DecimalSeparator num Digit+ num DecimalSeparator _ ; 

source special_chars.foma

regex 
NormalizeCharacters.o. 
Stage1 .o. 
Stage2 .o. 
Stage3 .o. 
Stage4 .o. 
Stage5 ; 
